smi/src/fst/stems/arabic_roman_digits.lexc
LEXICON CLOCK-sep !!≈ * __@CODE@__ different separators for intervals, or one clock time only
   %– ARABICCLOCK2 ; ! en dash
   numclock ; ! one clock time indication only
   %,:%,  ARABICCLOCKDECIMALS    ; ! clock time with fractional seconds (e.g. sports)
   %-:∑- ARABICCLOCK2 ;       ! 12.00-12.30   = no space
   %-:% ∑-%   ARABICCLOCK2x ;  ! 12.00 - 12.30 = space (common)
   %-:∑-%   ARABICCLOCK2x ;    ! 12.00- 12.30  = inconcistent space (found in corpus)
   %-:% ∑-  ARABICCLOCK2x ;    ! 12.00 -12.30  = inconcistent space (found in corpus)
   %–:% %–%  ARABICCLOCK2x ; ! en dash, spaces as above
   %–:% %– ARABICCLOCK2x ; ! en dash
   %–:%–%  ARABICCLOCK2x ; ! en dash


LEXICON ARABICCLOCK2 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ is the second component of intervals, idntical to ARABICCLOCK
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
 <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;
 <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclock ;

LEXICON ARABICCLOCK2x !!≈ * __@CODE@__ is the second component of intervals,
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclockx ;
 < [1|2|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclockx ;
 <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %. [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclockx ;
 <   [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] %: [1|2|3|4|5|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numclockx ;

LEXICON ARABICCLOCKDECIMALS !!≈ * __@CODE@__ is fractional seconds
 <  [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0]+ > numclock ;

LEXICON ARABICYEAR !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > numyear ;

LEXICON numyear !!≈ * __@CODE@__
       yeartag  ;
 %/:%/ moreyear ;
 %-:∑- moreyear ;
 %–:%– moreyear ;
 %-:∑- moreyearx ;
 %–:% %–%  moreyearx ;
 %-:% ∑-%  moreyearx ;
 %–:% %–  moreyearx ;
 %-:% ∑-  moreyearx ;
 %–:%–%  moreyearx ;
 %-:∑-%  moreyearx ;


LEXICON moreyear !!≈ * __@CODE@__
                              < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartagpl ;
 < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartagpl ;

LEXICON moreyearx !!≈ * __@CODE@__
                              < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartagplx ;
 < [1|2] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > yeartagplx ;


LEXICON yeartagplx !!≈ * __@CODE@__
+Use/NG:  yeartagpl ;

LEXICON ARABICORD !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPORD ;
                       < [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9]    > ARABICLOOPORD ;
                                          1%0%0   ARABICLOOPORD ;


!LEXICON ARABICLOOPphone      +358(0)16671254, 01-16671254, 166 71 254
! + ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;   !
!   ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;

!LEXICON ARABICLOOPphoneNum    +358(0)16671254, 01-16671254, 166 71 254
!< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
!< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICLOOPphoneSep ;
!< [1|2|3|4|5|6|7|8|9|%0] > ARABICCASEphone ;
!
!LEXICON ARABICLOOPphoneSep     +358(0)16671254, 01-16671254, 166 71 254
!  (                      ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
!  )                      ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
!  —                      ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
! %-:∑-                   ARABICLOOPphoneNum ;
! %                       ARABICLOOPphoneNum ; ! Space as separator


LEXICON REALARABICDELIMITER  !!≈ * __@CODE@__
                     ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1-4 arabics to casesuffixses
            %,       REALARABICDECIM ;
            %-:∑-    REALARABICDECIM ;
            %–       REALARABICDECIM ;
            %-:∑-    REALARABIC      ; ! 1-2 multipart numbers
            %–:%–    REALARABIC      ; ! 1–2 multipart numbers
            %—:%—    REALARABIC      ; ! 1—2 multipart numbers
           ,%-:,∑-   NUM-ARABICCASES ; ! 10,-
  ,%-+Err/Orth:.∑-   NUM-ARABICCASES ; ! 10.- It is wrong, but written.
 % %%+Err/Orth:%%    ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 50%. It is wrong, but 75 % of us write "75%".
          % %%:% %%  ARABICDELIMITER ; ! the correct ones as well... 50 % etc.


LEXICON ARABICLOOP   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
                           ARABIC          ;
             %.%-:%.∑-     ARABIC          ; ! 1.-2 multipart numbers ! !
             %.%–:%.%–     ARABIC          ; ! 1.–2 multipart numbers ! !
             %.%—:%.%—     ARABIC          ; ! 1.—2 multipart numbers ! !
             %.%-:%.% ∑-   ARABICORD       ; ! 1. -2. multipart numbers ! !
             %.%-:%.%-%    ARABICORD       ; ! 1. - 2. multipart numbers ! !
             %.%-:%.% ∑-%  ARABICORD       ; ! 1. - 2. multipart numbers ! !
             %.%–:%.% %–%  ARABICORD       ; ! 1. – 2. multipart numbers ! !
             %.%-:%.∑-     ARABICORD       ; ! 1.-2. multipart numbers ! !
             %.%–:%.%–     ARABICORD       ; ! 1.–2. multipart numbers ! !
             %.%—:%.%—     ARABICORD       ; ! 1.—2. multipart numbers ! !
              %-%:∑-%      ARABIC          ; ! 1- 2 multipart numbers
              %–%:%–%      ARABIC          ; ! 1– 2 multipart numbers
              %—%:%—%      ARABIC          ; ! 1— 2 multipart numbers
             % %-:% ∑-     ARABIC          ; ! 1 -2 multipart numbers
             % %–:% %–     ARABIC          ; ! 1 –2 multipart numbers
             % %—:% %—     ARABIC          ; ! 1 —2 multipart numbers
            % %-%:% ∑-%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 - 2 multipart numbers
            % %–%:% %–%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 – 2 multipart numbers
            % %—%:% %—%    ARABIC          ; ! 1 — 2 multipart numbers
          % %-%-%:% ∑-∑-%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 -- 2 multipart numbers
          % %–%–%:% %–%–%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 –– 2 multipart numbers
          % %—%—%:% %—%—%  ARABIC          ; ! 1 —— 2 multipart numbers
               %.:%.       ARABIC          ;
                %::%:      ARABIC          ;
!              %,:%,       ARABIC          ;
                 :         ARABIC          ; ! Allowing for "23 500" w/nbsp (init char = alt-space)
!               %:%        ARABIC          ; ! Allowing for "23 500". Lene: Denne er plagsom og bør forbedres. F.eks. 2017 30 vil vi ikke ha om ett tall.
               %/:%/       ARABIC          ; ! 24/12
              %/%:%/%      ARABIC          ; ! 24/ 12
             % %/:% %/     ARABIC          ; ! 24 /12
                ':'        ARABIC          ; ! Since ' denotes cons.grad. This is not optimal either.

             +Num:         RNum            ; ! Num Cmp Noun, with hyphen

!   % %-+Err/Orth:% ∑-     ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1 - multipart numbers - "1 -:s"?
! % %-%-+Err/Orth:% ∑-∑-   ARABICDELIMITER ; ! 1 -- multipart numbers
!                          ARABICDELIMITER ; ! list of number-case delimiters
                           ID-ARABIC       ;


LEXICON MARKDOT !!≈ * __@CODE@__
! This should create a new backtrack-point before the dot, but no sub-reading:
   +Use/-PMatch:%. # ;
< "+Use/PMatch":0 "@P.Pmatch.Backtrack@" 0:%. > # ; ! This creates a split point
   +Use/PMatch+CLBfinal: # ; ! This creates an alternative end point for those
                             ! requiring a full stop, so that when the previous line
                             ! forces a bactrack and reanalysis, the expression can
                             ! end up here, and then make the additional PUNCT analysis
                             ! of the full stop. Without this line, there will never
                             ! be this extra analysis, and the abbr/date/whatever +
                             ! end of sentence reading will never be possible.



! The Roman numerals !
! ------------------ !

LEXICON ROMAN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__  roman numerals
 +Use/Circ: ROM-THOUSAND ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE ; !
  ROM-SINGEL ; !


LEXICON ROM-SINGEL   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    I+Use/NG:i    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   II+Use/NG:ii   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  III+Use/NG:iii  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IV+Use/NG:iv   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    V+Use/NG:v    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   VI+Use/NG:vi   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  VII+Use/NG:vii  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
 VIII+Use/NG:viii ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IX+Use/NG:ix   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    X+Use/NG:x   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XI+Use/NG:xi   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XII+Use/NG:xii   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XIII+Use/NG:xiii   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XIV+Use/NG:xiv   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XV+Use/NG:xv   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XVI+Use/NG:xvi   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XVII+Use/NG:xvii   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XVIII+Use/NG:xviii   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XIX+Use/NG:xix   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   XX+Use/NG:xx   ROM-ONE-TAG ;


LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
     M+Use/Circ:M     ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
    MM+Use/Circ:MM    ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
   MMM+Use/Circ:MMM   ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
  MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM  ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-THOUSAND-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG   ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN     ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE     ; !
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT   ; !

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    C+Use/Circ:C    ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CC+Use/Circ:CC   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  CCC+Use/Circ:CCC  ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CD+Use/Circ:CD   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
    D+Use/Circ:D    ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   DC+Use/Circ:DC   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  DCC+Use/Circ:DCC  ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CM+Use/Circ:CM   ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-HUNDRED-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-TEN   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

LEXICON ROM-TEN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    X+Use/Circ:X    ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XX+Use/Circ:XX   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  XXX+Use/Circ:XXX  ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XL+Use/Circ:XL   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
    L+Use/Circ:L    ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   LX+Use/Circ:LX   ROM-TEN-TAG ;
  LXX+Use/Circ:LXX  ROM-TEN-TAG ;
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX ROM-TEN-TAG ;
   XC+Use/Circ:XC   ROM-TEN-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-TEN-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-ONE   ;
 +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

LEXICON ROM-ONE   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    I:I    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   II:II   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  III:III  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IV:IV   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
    V:V    ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   VI:VI   ROM-ONE-TAG ;
  VII:VII  ROM-ONE-TAG ;
 VIII:VIII ROM-ONE-TAG ;
   IX:IX   ROM-ONE-TAG ;

LEXICON ROM-ONE-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
  +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ;
!        +N: ROMNUMTAG ; ! !The Olav viđeš fix (Roman V now gets A)
  +Use/Circ: ROM-SPLIT ;

! Here, we split the Roman numerals, in order to account for cases like
! "Kapihtal II-IV". We may send this first part directly to ROM-TAG below (and
! get the +Num tag), or we may send them through a second loop, identical to
! the first one, but marked wit "2" (the lexica are called 2ROMAN, etc. We do
! this instead of making a loop, since we do not want cases like
! "II-IV-VI-VII-IX". If that should turn out to be a good idea, a loop would
! do the trick.

LEXICON ROM-SPLIT   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 %-+Use/Circ:∑- 2ROMAN ; ! II-VI, etc. !


! Here goes loop 2.

LEXICON 2ROMAN   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-THOUSAND ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED  ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN      ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE      ;

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
     M+Use/Circ:M     2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
    MM+Use/Circ:MM    2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
   MMM+Use/Circ:MMM   2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
  MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM  2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG    ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN     ;
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE     ;

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
    C+Use/Circ:C    2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CC+Use/Circ:CC   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  CCC+Use/Circ:CCC  2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CD+Use/Circ:CD   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
    D+Use/Circ:D    2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   DC+Use/Circ:DC   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
  DCC+Use/Circ:DCC  2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
   CM+Use/Circ:CM   2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;
